Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB101.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 103 of the act of December 18, 2001 (P.L.949, No.114), known as the Workforce Development Act, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Aggregated statistical form." In the case of information regarding individuals, a data set that includes information about no fewer than 10 individuals, and in the case of employer information, a data set that includes information about no fewer than three employees, of which no one employer comprises more than 80% of the aggregated data set."Application for benefits." As defined in 34 Pa. Code § 61.1 (relating to definitions).* * *"Data dashboard." A web-based or other electronic tool that displays data in an easily accessible and user-friendly format that includes information from the new hire database, unemployment compensation claimant data and unemployment compensation wage records.* * *"New hire database." The Commonwealth directory of new hires established under 23 Pa.C.S. § 4392 (relating to employer reporting).* * *Section 2. Section 504(b) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 504. Plan, functions and responsibilities.* * *(b) Functions and responsibilities.--A local workforce development board has the following functions and responsibilities:* * *(9) As follows:(i) Subject to subparagraph (ii), to receive the new 20250SB0101PN0986 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hire database and unemployment information from the Department of Labor and Industry and to utilize the information when developing a local plan, assessing program eligibility and researching.(ii) A local workforce development board may submit a request to the Department of Labor and Industry for an exemption from the responsibility under subparagraph (i). The request must be in writing and must include an explanation for the request.* * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 504.1. Technical assistance and data availability.(a) Development.--A data dashboard shall be developed and maintained by the Center for Workforce Information and Analysis of the Department of Labor and Industry DEPARTMENT or an authorized representative. The data dashboard shall provide users with the ability to view and filter data according to various criteria, including location, occupation, industry and demographic characteristics and additional metrics that may apply. The Center for Workforce Information and Analysis shall ensure that the data dashboard and reports are accurate, reliable and timely and meet the needs of the local workforce development boards for research, performance monitoring and improvement.(b) Assistance.--The Center for Workforce Information and Analysis shall provide technical assistance to local workforce development boards for the use of the data dashboard and the interpretation of data displayed in the data dashboard in accordance with the following:(1) Technical assistance shall include training for 20250SB0101PN0986 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 effective data dissemination, data interpretation, analysis, reporting, research and demonstration.(2) Technical assistance shall be made available to the chief elected official of a local workforce development board, any other Federal, State or local government agency and the agents or contractors of a governmental agency or public official, on a regular basis, and shall be tailored to meet the unique needs of each agency.(3) Fees or charges may not be imposed for technical assistance related to the data dashboard and the interpretation of the data displayed in the data dashboard.(C) PRIORITY OF FUNDING.--NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, EXPENDITURES FROM THE REEMPLOYMENT FUND UNDER SECTION 601.5 OF THE ACT OF DECEMBER 5, 1936 (2ND SP.SESS., 1937 P.L.2897, NO.1), KNOWN AS THE UNEMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION LAW, SHALL FIRST BE USED TO IMPLEMENT AND ADMINISTER THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ENSURE THAT THE COSTS OF DEVELOPING, MAINTAINING AND OPERATING THE DATA DASHBOARD AND OF PROVIDING TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE UNDER THIS SECTION ARE PAID FROM THE REEMPLOYMENT FUND PRIOR TO THE USE OF THE REEMPLOYMENT FUND FOR ANY OTHER PURPOSE AUTHORIZED UNDER THE UNEMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION LAW OR ANY OTHER STATE LAW.(D) DEFINITION.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE TERM "DEPARTMENT" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY OF THE COMMONWEALTH.Section 504.2. Local performance accountability.(a) Authorization.--Notwithstanding 20 CFR Ch. V Pt. 603 (relating to Federal-State Unemployment Compensation (UC) Program; confidentiality and disclosure of State UC information), for purposes of performance accountability and 20250SB0101PN0986 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 evaluation, the department shall develop and disseminate information, including unemployment compensation claimant information, unemployment compensation wage records and new hire database information, for use in the performance of official duties by a local workforce development board and as permitted in subsection (c). Data shall be disseminated in a data dashboard and updated regularly in accordance with data availability of unemployment compensation claimant information, unemployment compensation wage records and new hire database information.(b) Disclosure.--Disclosure of unemployment compensation information, including the application for benefits and employer's reports of wages paid to employees, shall be made available to the chief elected official of a local workforce development board, any other Federal, State or local government agency and the agents or contractors of a governmental agency or public official, if the information is to be used as provided in subsection (c). Fees or charges may not be imposed for access to data under this subsection unless mandated by Federal law.(c) Allowable uses of disclosed information.--Allowable uses of information disclosed under subsection (b) include:(1) Evaluation of program performance, including longitudinal outcome analysis of programs funded by public or private money, or a combination thereof, to the extent permitted by Federal law.(2) Financial or other analysis required by Federal, State or local law or regulation or federally approved plans.(3) Preparation of reports required by Federal, State or local law or regulation or federally approved plans. The data dashboard and accompanying reports created by the Center for 20250SB0101PN0986 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Workforce Information and Analysis or an authorized representative under section 504.1 shall be deemed as satisfactory documentation and verification for performance monitoring, client eligibility and work requirement purposes required by core, mandated and nonmandated partners and programs.(4) Operation of public programs by the agencies and their agents, contractors and subcontractors, if the secretary determines that the information sharing is for the purpose of improving the quality or delivery of program services or to create operational efficiencies.(5) Establishment of common case management systems between Federal, State or local agencies delivering or supporting workforce services for a shared customer base, whenever the common case management system is for the purpose of fostering workforce partnerships, program coordination, interagency collaboration, improving program services or creating operational efficiencies.(d) Confidentiality and protection of information.--The following apply to required confidentiality and protection of information disclosed under subsection (b) for allowable uses under subsection (c):(1) The dissemination, disclosure and use of the information must be outlined in a written agreement as required by 20 CFR Ch. V Pt. 603 and in accordance with subsection (e).(2) Any redisclosure of information obtained by the agency or its agent or contractor shall be limited to tabulation and publication of the information in an aggregated statistical form, except when the agency and its 20250SB0101PN0986 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agent or contractor or another agency must exchange the information for an authorized purpose as provided for in the written agreement required by 20 CFR Ch. V Pt. 603.(3) No individual identifying information obtained in accordance with subsection (c) shall be redisclosed in the course of the tabulation or publication.(4) Upon the disclosure of the information under subsection (b), the information may be used for a specific period of time as provided for in the written agreement required by 20 CFR Ch. V Pt. 603, not to exceed a period of up to 10 years unless the agreement is renewed for additional periods of time.(e) Agreement.--The department shall develop a written agreement, required by subsection (d)(1), with each local workforce development board in this Commonwealth in accordance with the following:(1) The agreement shall be on a form prescribed by the department.(2) The agreement, at a minimum, shall include:(i) A description of the specific information to be furnished and the purposes for which the information is sought.(ii) A statement that those who receive information under the agreement will be limited to those with a need to access it for purposes listed in the agreement.(iii) The methods and timing for dissemination and format of the information. Dissemination of information shall occur, at a minimum, once per financial quarter.(iv) A provision for paying the State agency for any costs of furnishing the information.20250SB0101PN0986 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) A provision for safeguarding the information disclosed.(vi) A provision for inspections of the agency, entity or contractor to ensure that the requirements of Federal law and this section are being met.(f) Payment for disclosure of requested unemployment information.--Except as permitted under applicable law or regulation, or as otherwise authorized by agreement between the department and the United States Department of Labor, Federal unemployment insurance grant funds shall not be used to pay for any of the costs incurred by the department in processing and handling a request for disclosure of unemployment information made under this section. The costs shall be calculated, collected and administered by the department consistent with applicable Federal rules and guidelines. If the recipient is a public official, the department may accept payment of costs by way of reimbursement.(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Secretary." The Secretary of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth.Section 4. Nothing in this act shall be construed to conflict with Federal law.Section 5. This act shall take effect in six months.20250SB0101PN0986 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627